Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
CHAPTER 620 Dependency, Neglect, and Abuse

620.010.
Legislative purpose.

In addition to the purposes set forth in KRS

600.010

, this chapter shall be interpreted to effectuate the following express legislative purposes regarding the treatment of dependent, neglected and abused children. Children have certain fundamental rights which must be protected and preserved, including but not limited to, the rights to adequate food, clothing and shelter; the right to be free from physical, sexual or emotional injury or exploitation; the right to develop physically, mentally, and emotionally to their potential; and the right to educational instruction and the right to a secure, stable family. It is further recognized that upon some occasions, in order to protect and preserve the rights and needs of children, it is necessary to remove a child from his or her parents.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 62, effective July 1, 1987.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 199 read: “KRS

446.250

to

446.320

to the contrary notwithstanding, Acts 1986, ch. 423 shall prevail in the event of a conflict between Acts 1986, ch. 423 and other Acts passed by the 1986 regular session of the General Assembly.”

620.020.
Definitions for chapter.

The definitions in KRS Chapter 600 shall apply to this chapter. In addition, as used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Case permanency plan” means a document identifying decisions made by the cabinet, for both the biological family and the child, concerning action which needs to be taken to assure that the child in foster care expeditiously obtains a permanent home;

“Case progress report” means a written record of goals that have been achieved in the case of a child;

“Case record” means a cabinet file of specific documents and a running record of activities pertaining to the child;

“Children’s advocacy center” means an agency that advocates on behalf of children alleged to have been abused; that assists in the coordination of the investigation of child abuse by providing a location for forensic interviews and medical examinations, and by promoting the coordination of services for children alleged to have been abused; and that provides, directly or by formalized agreements, services that include, but are not limited to, forensic interviews, medical examinations, mental health and related support services, court advocacy, consultation, training, and staffing of multidisciplinary teams;

“Foster care” means the provision of temporary twenty-four (24) hour care for a child for a planned period of time when the child is:

Removed from his parents or person exercising custodial control or supervision and subsequently placed in the custody of the cabinet; and

Placed in a foster home or private child-caring facility or child-placing agency but remains under the supervision of the cabinet;

“Local citizen foster care review board” means a citizen board which provides periodic permanency reviews of children placed in the custody of the cabinet by a court order of temporary custody or commitment under this chapter;

“Multidisciplinary teams” means local teams operating under protocols governing roles, responsibilities, and procedures developed by the Kentucky Multidisciplinary Commission on Child Sexual Abuse pursuant to KRS

431.600

;

“Pediatric abusive head trauma” means the various injuries or conditions that may result following the vigorous shaking, slamming, or impacting the head of an infant or young child. These injuries or conditions, also known as pediatric acquired abusive head trauma, have in the past been called “Shaken Baby Syndrome” or “Shaken Infant Syndrome.” Pediatric abusive head trauma injuries or conditions have included but are not limited to the following:

Irreversible brain damage;

Blindness;

Retinal hemorrhage;

Eye damage;

Cerebral palsy;

Hearing loss;

Spinal cord injury;

Paralysis;

Seizures;

Learning disability;

Death;

Central nervous system injury as evidenced by central nervous system hemorrhaging;

Closed head injury;

Rib fracture; and

Subdural hematoma;

“Permanence” means a relationship between a child and an adult which is intended to last a lifetime, providing commitment and continuity in the child’s relationships and a sense of belonging;

“Position of authority” has the same meaning as in KRS

532.045

;

“Position of special trust” has the same meaning as in KRS

532.045

;

“Preventive services” means those services which are designed to help maintain and strengthen the family unit by preventing or eliminating the need for removal of children from the family;

“Reasonable efforts” means the exercise of ordinary diligence and care by the department to utilize all preventive and reunification services available to the community in accordance with the state plan for Public Law 96-272 which are necessary to enable the child to safely live at home;

“Reunification services” means remedial and preventive services which are designed to strengthen the family unit, to secure reunification of the family and child where appropriate, as quickly as practicable, and to prevent the future removal of the child from the family; and

“State citizen foster care review board” means a board created by KRS

620.310

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 63, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 258, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 350, § 41, effective April 10, 1988; 1992, ch. 434, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 18, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 301, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 144, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 87, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2010, ch. 171, § 16, effective July 15, 2010; 2019 ch. 33, § 8, effective June 27, 2019.

620.023.
Evidence to be considered in determining the best interest of a child.

Evidence of the following circumstances if relevant shall be considered by the court in all proceedings conducted pursuant to KRS Chapter 620 in which the court is required to render decisions in the best interest of the child:

Mental illness as defined in KRS

202A.011

or an intellectual disability as defined in KRS

202B.010

of the parent, as attested to by a qualified mental health professional, which renders the parent unable to care for the immediate and ongoing needs of the child;

Acts of abuse or neglect as defined in KRS

600.020

toward any child;

Substance use disorder, as defined in KRS

222.005

, that results in an incapacity by the parent or caretaker to provide essential care and protection for the child;

A finding of domestic violence and abuse as defined in KRS

403.720

, whether or not committed in the presence of the child;

Any other crime committed by a parent which results in the death or permanent physical or mental disability of a member of that parent’s family or household; and

The existence of any guardianship or conservatorship of the parent pursuant to a determination of disability or partial disability as made under KRS

387.500

to

387.770

and

387.990

.

In determining the best interest of the child, the court may consider the effectiveness of rehabilitative efforts made by the parent or caretaker intended to address circumstances in this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 57, § 7, effective March 17, 1998; 2004, ch. 116, § 18, effective July 13, 2004; 2012, ch. 146, § 140, effective July 12, 2012; 2019 ch. 128, § 30, effective June 27, 2019.

620.025.
Jurisdictional precedence.

A finding of jurisdiction under this chapter shall not necessarily preclude a finding of jurisdiction under KRS Chapters 625, 630, or 635; however, jurisdiction under this chapter shall take precedence. No child shall be released from the jurisdiction of the court under this chapter if concurrent complaints under KRS Chapters 630 or 635 are pending.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 42, effective April 10, 1988.

620.027.
District Court’s concurrent jurisdiction for child custody and visitation in permanent placement cases.

The District Court has jurisdiction, concurrent with that of the Circuit Court, to determine matters of child custody and visitation in cases that come before the District Court where the need for a permanent placement and custody order is established as set forth in this chapter. The District Court, in making these determinations, shall utilize the provisions of KRS Chapter 403 relating to child custody and visitation. In any case where the child is actually residing with a grandparent in a stable relationship, the court may recognize the grandparent as having the same standing as a parent for evaluating what custody arrangements are in the best interest of the child.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 314, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 60, § 5, effective July 14, 2000.

620.029.
Duties of cabinet relating to children who are victims of human trafficking.

In order to provide the most effective treatment for children who are victims of human trafficking, as defined in KRS

529.010

, the cabinet shall:

Investigate a report alleging a child is a victim of human trafficking pursuant to KRS 620.030(3);

Provide or ensure the provision of appropriate treatment, housing, and services consistent with the status of the child as a victim of human trafficking; and

Proceed in the case in accordance with applicable statutes governing cases involving dependency, neglect, or abuse regardless of whether the person believed to have caused the human trafficking of the child is a parent, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or supervision.

In order to effectuate the requirements of this section, the cabinet shall:

Consult with agencies serving victims of human trafficking to promulgate administrative regulations for the treatment of children who are reported to be victims of human trafficking as dependent, neglected, or abused children, including providing for appropriate screening, assessment, treatment, services, temporary and long-term placement of these children, training of staff, the designation of specific staff, and collaboration with service providers and law enforcement; and

By November 1 of each year, beginning in 2013, submit to the Legislative Research Commission a comprehensive report detailing the number of reports the cabinet has received regarding child victims of human trafficking, the number of reports in which the cabinet has investigated and determined that a child is the victim of human trafficking, and the number of cases in which services were provided.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 25, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/25/2013). This statute was created in Section 1 of 2013 Ky. Acts ch. 25. Section 28 of that Act states that “Sections 1 to 28 of this Act may be cited as the ‘Human Trafficking Victims Rights Act.’ ”

620.030.
Duty to report dependency, neglect, abuse, human trafficking, or female genital mutilation — Husband-wife and professional-client/patient privileges not grounds for refusal to report — Exceptions — Penalties.

Any person who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that a child is dependent, neglected, or abused shall immediately cause an oral or written report to be made to a local law enforcement agency or to the Department of Kentucky State Police, the cabinet or its designated representative, the Commonwealth’s attorney, or the county attorney by telephone or otherwise. Any supervisor who receives from an employee a report of suspected dependency, neglect, or abuse shall promptly make a report to the proper authorities for investigation. If the cabinet receives a report of abuse or neglect allegedly committed by a person other than a parent, guardian, fictive kin, person in a position of authority, person in a position of special trust, or person exercising custodial control or supervision, the cabinet shall refer the matter to the Commonwealth’s attorney or the county attorney and the local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police. Nothing in this section shall relieve individuals of their obligations to report.

Any person, including but not limited to a physician, osteopathic physician, nurse, teacher, school personnel, social worker, coroner, medical examiner, child-caring personnel, resident, intern, chiropractor, dentist, optometrist, emergency medical technician, paramedic, health professional, mental health professional, peace officer, or any organization or agency for any of the above, who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that a child is dependent, neglected, or abused, regardless of whether the person believed to have caused the dependency, neglect, or abuse is a parent, guardian, fictive kin, person in a position of authority, person in a position of special trust, person exercising custodial control or supervision, or another person, or who has attended such child as a part of his or her professional duties shall, if requested, in addition to the report required in subsection (1) or (3) of this section, file with the local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police, the cabinet or its designated representative, the Commonwealth’s attorney, or county attorney within forty-eight (48) hours of the original report a written report containing:

The names and addresses of the child and his or her parents or other persons exercising custodial control or supervision;

The child’s age;

The nature and extent of the child’s alleged dependency, neglect, or abuse, including any previous charges of dependency, neglect, or abuse, to this child or his or her siblings;

The name and address of the person allegedly responsible for the abuse or neglect; and

Any other information that the person making the report believes may be helpful in the furtherance of the purpose of this section.

Any person who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that a child is a victim of human trafficking as defined in KRS

529.010

shall immediately cause an oral or written report to be made to a local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police; or the cabinet or its designated representative; or the Commonwealth’s attorney or the county attorney; by telephone or otherwise. This subsection shall apply regardless of whether the person believed to have caused the human trafficking of the child is a parent, guardian, fictive kin, person in a position of authority, person in a position of special trust, or person exercising custodial control or supervision.

Any person who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that a child is a victim of female genital mutilation as defined in KRS

508.125

shall immediately cause an oral or written report to be made by telephone or otherwise to:

A local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police;

The cabinet or its designated representative; or

The Commonwealth’s attorney or the county attorney. This subsection shall apply regardless of whether the person believed to have caused the female genital mutilation of the child is a parent, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or supervision.

Neither the husband-wife nor any professional-client/patient privilege, except the attorney-client and clergy-penitent privilege, shall be a ground for refusing to report under this section or for excluding evidence regarding a dependent, neglected, or abused child or the cause thereof, in any judicial proceedings resulting from a report pursuant to this section. This subsection shall also apply in any criminal proceeding in District or Circuit Court regarding a dependent, neglected, or abused child.

The cabinet upon request shall receive from any agency of the state or any other agency, institution, or facility providing services to the child or his or her family, such cooperation, assistance, and information as will enable the cabinet to fulfill its responsibilities under KRS

620.030

,

620.040

, and

620.050

.

Nothing in this section shall limit the cabinet’s investigatory authority under KRS

620.050

or any other obligation imposed by law.

Any person who intentionally violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a:

Class B misdemeanor for the first offense;

Class A misdemeanor for the second offense; and

Class D felony for each subsequent offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 64, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 258, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 350, § 43, effective April 10, 1988; 2007, ch. 85, § 330, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 72, § 4, effective July 15, 2008; 2013, ch. 25, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2019 ch. 33, § 9, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 74, § 7, effective April 2, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

The 1988 amendments to this section are effective April 10, 1988, except for the second sentence of subsection (1), which is effective July 15, 1988.

620.032.
Annual report by cabinet detailing reports received regarding female genital mutilation.

By November 1 of each year, beginning in 2021, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall submit to the Legislative Research Commission a comprehensive report that does not identify individuals, detailing the number of reports the cabinet has received regarding female genital mutilation as defined in KRS

508.125

, the number of reports in which the cabinet has investigated and determined that a child is the victim of female genital mutilation, and the number of cases in which services were provided.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 74, § 8, effective April 2, 2020.

620.040.
Duties of prosecutor, police, and cabinet — Prohibition as to school personnel — Multidisciplinary teams.

Upon receipt of a report alleging abuse or neglect by a parent, guardian, fictive kin, person in a position of authority, person in a position of special trust, or person exercising custodial control or supervision, pursuant to KRS 620.030(1) or (2), or a report alleging a child is a victim of human trafficking pursuant to KRS 620.030(3), the recipient of the report shall immediately notify the cabinet or its designated representative, the local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police, and the Commonwealth’s or county attorney of the receipt of the report unless they are the reporting source.

Based upon the allegation in the report, the cabinet shall immediately make an initial determination as to the risk of harm and immediate safety of the child. Based upon the level of risk determined, the cabinet shall investigate the allegation or accept the report for an assessment of family needs and, if appropriate, may provide or make referral to any community-based services necessary to reduce risk to the child and to provide family support. A report of sexual abuse or human trafficking of a child shall be considered high risk and shall not be referred to any other community agency.

The cabinet shall, within seventy-two (72) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, make a written report to the Commonwealth’s or county attorney and the local enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police concerning the action that has been taken on the investigation.

If the report alleges abuse or neglect by someone other than a parent, guardian, fictive kin, person in a position of authority, person in a position of special trust, or person exercising custodial control or supervision, or the human trafficking of a child, the cabinet shall immediately notify the Commonwealth’s or county attorney and the local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police.

Upon receipt of a report alleging dependency pursuant to KRS 620.030(1) and (2), the recipient shall immediately notify the cabinet or its designated representative.

Based upon the allegation in the report, the cabinet shall immediately make an initial determination as to the risk of harm and immediate safety of the child. Based upon the level of risk, the cabinet shall investigate the allegation or accept the report for an assessment of family needs and, if appropriate, may provide or make referral to any community-based services necessary to reduce risk to the child and to provide family support. A report of sexual abuse or human trafficking of a child shall be considered high risk and shall not be referred to any other community agency.

The cabinet need not notify the local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police or county attorney or Commonwealth’s attorney of reports made under this subsection unless the report involves the human trafficking of a child, in which case the notification shall be required.

If the cabinet or its designated representative receives a report of abuse by a person other than a parent, guardian, fictive kin, person in a position of authority, person in a position of special trust, or other person exercising custodial control or supervision of a child, it shall immediately notify the local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Commonwealth’s or county attorney of the receipt of the report and its contents, and they shall investigate the matter. The cabinet or its designated representative shall participate in an investigation of noncustodial physical abuse or neglect at the request of the local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police. The cabinet shall participate in all investigations of reported or suspected sexual abuse or human trafficking of a child.

School personnel or other persons listed in KRS 620.030(2) do not have the authority to conduct internal investigations in lieu of the official investigations outlined in this section.

If, after receiving the report, the law enforcement officer, the cabinet, or its designated representative cannot gain admission to the location of the child, a search warrant shall be requested from, and may be issued by, the judge to the appropriate law enforcement official upon probable cause that the child is dependent, neglected, or abused. If, pursuant to a search under a warrant, a child is discovered and appears to be in imminent danger, the child may be removed by the law enforcement officer.

If a child who is in a hospital or under the immediate care of a physician appears to be in imminent danger if he or she is returned to the persons having custody of him or her, the physician or hospital administrator may hold the child without court order, provided that a request is made to the court for an emergency custody order at the earliest practicable time, not to exceed seventy-two (72) hours.

Any appropriate law enforcement officer may take a child into protective custody and may hold that child in protective custody without the consent of the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision if there exist reasonable grounds for the officer to believe that the child is in danger of imminent death or serious physical injury, is being sexually abused, or is a victim of human trafficking and that the parents or other person exercising custodial control or supervision are unable or unwilling to protect the child. The officer or the person to whom the officer entrusts the child shall, within twelve (12) hours of taking the child into protective custody, request the court to issue an emergency custody order.

When a law enforcement officer, hospital administrator, or physician takes a child into custody without the consent of the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision, he or she shall provide written notice to the parent or other person stating the reasons for removal of the child. Failure of the parent or other person to receive notice shall not, by itself, be cause for civil or criminal liability.

If a report includes a child fatality or near fatality, and the law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe any parent or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child was under the influence of alcohol or drugs at the time the fatality or near fatality occurred, the law enforcement officer shall request a test of blood, breath, or urine from that person.

If, after making the request, consent is not given for the test of blood, breath, or urine, a search warrant shall be requested from and may be issued by the judge to the appropriate law enforcement official upon probable cause that a child fatality or near fatality has occurred and that the person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child at the time of the fatality or near fatality was under the influence.

Any test requested under this section shall be conducted pursuant to the testing procedures and requirements in KRS

189A.103

.

To the extent practicable and when in the best interest of a child alleged to have been abused, interviews with the child shall be conducted at a children’s advocacy center.

One (1) or more multidisciplinary teams may be established in every county or group of contiguous counties.

Membership of the multidisciplinary team shall include but shall not be limited to social service workers employed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and law enforcement officers. Additional team members may include Commonwealth’s and county attorneys, children’s advocacy center staff, mental health professionals, medical professionals, victim advocates including advocates for victims of human trafficking, educators, and other related professionals, as deemed appropriate.

The multidisciplinary team shall review child sexual abuse cases and child human trafficking cases involving commercial sexual activity referred by participating professionals, including those in which the alleged perpetrator does not have custodial control or supervision of the child or is not responsible for the child’s welfare. The purpose of the multidisciplinary team shall be to review investigations, assess service delivery, and to facilitate efficient and appropriate disposition of cases through the criminal justice system.

The team shall hold regularly scheduled meetings if new reports of sexual abuse or child human trafficking cases involving commercial sexual activity are received or if active cases exist. At each meeting, each active case shall be presented and the agencies’ responses assessed.

The multidisciplinary team shall provide an annual report to the public of nonidentifying case information to allow assessment of the processing and disposition of child sexual abuse cases and child human trafficking cases involving commercial sexual activity.

Multidisciplinary team members and anyone invited by the multidisciplinary team to participate in a meeting shall not divulge case information, including information regarding the identity of the victim or source of the report. Team members and others attending meetings shall sign a confidentiality statement that is consistent with statutory prohibitions on disclosure of this information.

The multidisciplinary team shall, pursuant to KRS

431.600

and

431.660

, develop a local protocol consistent with the model protocol issued by the Kentucky Multidisciplinary Commission on Child Sexual Abuse. The local team shall submit the protocol to the commission for review and approval.

The multidisciplinary team review of a case may include information from reports generated by agencies, organizations, or individuals that are responsible for investigation, prosecution, or treatment in the case, KRS

610.320

to KRS

610.340

notwithstanding.

To the extent practicable, multidisciplinary teams shall be staffed by the local children’s advocacy center.

Nothing in this section shall limit the cabinet’s investigatory authority under KRS

620.050

or any other obligation imposed by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 65, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 258, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 350, § 44, effective April 10, 1988; 1990, ch. 39, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 434, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 217, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 18, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 617, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 63, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 144, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 164, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 665, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 331, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 25, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2019 ch. 33, § 10, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 139, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

620.045.
Funding for regional children’s advocacy center.

The secretaries of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet are authorized to make state grants and other fund allocations to assist nonprofit corporations in the establishment and operation of regional children’s advocacy centers.

To be eligible for grants from any state government entity, a children’s advocacy center shall meet the statutory definition of a children’s advocacy center as provided in this chapter and shall operate consistent with administrative regulations promulgated by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 144, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 71, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 332, effective June 26, 2007.